test/src/morphology/vep-test-V-sanuda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - sanuda: # Verb '/(eng) to say /(fin) sanoa' - full paradigm
# (Zaiceva, Nina 2010: Uz' vepsä-venälaine vajehnik, pp. 503-507)
     sanuda+V+Der/da+Inf: sanuda
# check these
#     sanuda+V+Der/des+Inf+Ine: sanudes
#     sanuda+V+Der/den+Inf+EssInst: sanuden
     sanuda+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ill: sanumha
     sanuda+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ine: sanumas
     sanuda+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ela: sanumaspäi
     sanuda+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ade: sanumal
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: sanun
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: sanud
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: sanub
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: sanum
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: sanut
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: sanuba
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScSg: sanu
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl: sanugoi

     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: sanuin
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: sanuid
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: sanui
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: sanuim
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: sanuit
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: sanuiba
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScSg: sanund
     sanuda+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl: sanunugoi
     sanuda+V+Ind+PrfPrc+ScSg: sanunu
     sanuda+V+Ind+PrfPrc+ScPl: sanunuded

     sanuda+V+Imprt+ScSg2: sanu
     sanuda+V+Imprt+ScSg3: sanugaha
     sanuda+V+Imprt+ScPl1: sanugam
     sanuda+V+Imprt+ScPl2: sanugat
     sanuda+V+Imprt+ScPl3: sanugaha
     sanuda+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg: sanu
     sanuda+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl: sanugoi

     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: sanuižin
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: sanuižid
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: sanuiži
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: sanuižim
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: sanuižit
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: sanuižiba
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScSg: sanuiži
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl: sanuiži

     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1: sanunuižin
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2: sanunuižid
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3: sanunuiži
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1: sanunuižim
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2: sanunuižit
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3: sanunuižiba
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScSg: sanunuiži
     sanuda+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl: sanunuiži
